Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-628.01
Low-speed vehicle, defined.

(1) Low-speed vehicle means any:

(a) Four-wheeled motor vehicle:

(i) With a speed attainable in one mile of more than twenty miles per hour and not more than twenty-five miles per hour on a paved, level surface;

(ii) With a gross vehicle weight rating of less than three thousand pounds; and

(iii) That complies with 49 C.F.R. part 571, as such part existed on the date specified in section 60-201; or

(b) Three-wheeled motor vehicle:

(i) With a maximum speed attainable of not more than twenty-five miles per hour on a paved, level surface;

(ii) With a gross vehicle weight rating of less than three thousand pounds; and

(iii) That is equipped with a windshield and an occupant protection system.

(2) Low-speed vehicle does not include a motorcycle with a sidecar attached.

Laws 2011, LB289, § 31;

Laws 2016, LB929, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 72;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 95;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB270, § 40;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 67;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 17;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 69;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 42;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 50;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 50.